Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2438
Limitation on liability.

The Nebraska State Patrol or any agent, employee, or member thereof is not civilly liable to any injured person or his or her estate for any injury suffered, including any action for wrongful death or property damage suffered, relating to the issuance or revocation of a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued pursuant to the Concealed Handgun Permit Act.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 12.